Arkansas, session 2025, SB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) There is extensive data demonstrating that a population’s
increased access to quality primary care reduces overall healthcare costs and
improves health outcomes;
(2) Without access to high-quality primary care, healthcare
costs rise, preventable health issues escalate, and chronic disease burden
worsens;
(3) Studies demonstrate that investing more in primary care
reduces health system costs and improves a population’s health; and
(4) A population’s increased access to primary care results in
fewer emergency department visits, hospital stays, and surgeries.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to form a working group
to better understand the primary care system in this state and its effect on
health outcomes for Arkansans.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Arkansas Primary Care
Payment Improvement Working Group.
*JMB365*
03-18-2025 10:35:37 JMB365

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB264
(a) There is established the Arkansas Primary Care Payment Improvement
Working Group, to be composed of the following nine (9) members:
(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services, or his or
her designee;
(2) The Insurance Commissioner, or his or her designee;
(3) A designee of the Arkansas Center for Health Improvement;
(4) A practicing primary care physician appointed by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives;
(5) A representative of the Arkansas commercial health insurance
community from an Arkansas-based insurer appointed by the Speaker of the
House of Representatives;
(6) A pediatrician representative of the primary care community
in this state appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(7) A practicing primary care physician appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(8) An advanced practice registered nurse representative of the
primary care community in this state appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate; and
(9) A primary care physician employed by or primarily practicing
in a federal qualified health center appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
(b) The practicing primary care physician appointed by the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate shall serve as Chair of the Arkansas Primary Care
Payment Improvement Working Group and be responsible for scheduling regular
meetings of the working group.
(c) All members of the working group are voting members.
(d) Any vacancies that occur for any membership positions that are not
held as a function of office shall be filled by the selecting body upon
vacancy.
(e) The working group shall:
(1)(A) Establish a definition of primary care to be utilized by
the working group.
(B) The definition shall be applicable to primary care and
services provided under the Arkansas Medicaid Program and commercial
insurance plans;
(2) Identify any portion of the Arkansas Medicaid Program
03-18-2025 10:35:37 JMB365

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB264
population that should not be included in the study due to the unique
circumstances of the population;
(3) Create templates for data submission from commercial
insurance carriers and the Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(4) Conduct an evaluation of the current amount spent on primary
care and other healthcare services, both as it relates to the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and the commercial insurance carriers, including Medicare
Advantage plans;
(5) Determine the adequacy of the primary care delivery system
in Arkansas, including the effect this system has on the supply of the
primary care providers in this state;
(6) Study the primary care payment landscape in other states,
specifically considering states that have implemented a primary care spending
target; and
(7) Identify data collection and measurement systems as a basis
for creation of a primary care spending target for the Arkansas Medicaid
Program and commercial insurance carriers operating in this state that
includes a method by which to measure improvements made toward the primary
care spending target.
(f)(1) The working group may request and receive data from commercial
insurance carriers that do business in this state related to the provision of
and payment for primary care as a percentage of overall claims payment.
(2) Data received under subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall
include without limitation commercial insurance carrier submitted templates
that report information such as:
(A) Fee-for-service payments;
(B) Non-fee-for-service payments;
(C) Primary care incentive programs and requirements;
(D) The numbers of participating providers;
(E) Performance metrics;
(F) Prices;
(G) Utilization;
(H) Total cost trends; and
(I) Other information as identified in annual notices.
(3) A commercial insurance carrier shall use templates supplied
by the group in consultation with the State Insurance Department to provide
03-18-2025 10:35:37 JMB365

As Engrossed: S3/18/25 SB264
prospective and retrospective information to the group.
(4) The State Insurance Department shall monitor and ensure
compliance with this section.
(g)(1) No later than April 1, 2026, the working group shall submit a
report of its findings and recommendations to the Legislative Council.
(2) The report shall include a recommendation for a primary care
spending target for both commercial insurance carriers and the Arkansas
Medicaid Program designed to achieve better health outcomes and decreased
healthcare costs for the people of Arkansas.
(3) If the Arkansas Medicaid Program or any commercial insurance
carrier fails to meet the primary care spending targets adopted by the
Legislative Council based on the report under subdivision (g)(1) of this
section, the Legislative Council may request that a representative of the
entity failing to meet the primary care spending target appear before the
Legislative Council and provide details on the efforts the entity is making
to meet the primary care spending target.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-61-906(a), concerning data submission
under the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, no later
than January 1, 2016, and every quarter thereafter, a submitting entity shall
submit health and dental claims data, unique identifiers, and geographic and
demographic information for covered individuals as permitted in this
subchapter, nonclaims-based payments made to providers, and provider files to
the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative in accordance with standards
and procedures adopted by the State Insurance Department.

/s/Irvin







03-18-2025 10:35:37 JMB365